Illinois, session 104th, HB1809.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Capital Development Board Act is amended by 5changing Sections 10.09-1 and 10.18 and by adding Section 610.20 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 3105/10.09-1)8    Sec. 10.09-1. Certification of inspection.9    (a) No person may occupy a newly constructed commercial 10building or a substantially improved commercial building in a 11non-building code jurisdiction until:12        (1) The property owner or property owner's agent has 13    first contracted for the inspection of the building by an 14    inspector who meets the qualifications established by the 15    Board; and16        (2) The qualified inspector files a certification of 17    inspection with the municipality or county having such 18    jurisdiction over the property indicating that the 19    building complies with all of the following:20            (A) to the extent they do not conflict with the 21        codes and rules listed in subparagraphs (C) through 22        (F), the current edition or most recent preceding 23        edition of the following codes published by the   HB1809- 2 -LRB104 10472 HLH 20547 b1        International Code Council:2                (i) the International Building Code, including 3            Appendix G and excluding Chapters 11, 13, and 29;4                (ii) the International Existing Building Code;5            (B) to the extent it does not conflict with the 6        codes and rules listed in subparagraphs (C) through 7        (F), the current edition or most recent preceding 8        edition of the National Electrical Code published by 9        the National Fire Protection Association;10            (C) either:11                (i) The Energy Efficient Building Code adopted 12            under Section 15 of the Energy Efficient Building 13            Act; or14                (ii) The Illinois Stretch Energy Code adopted 15            under Section 55 of the Energy Efficient Building 16            Act;17            (D) the Illinois Accessibility Code adopted under 18        Section 4 of the Environmental Barriers Act;19            (E) the Illinois Plumbing Code adopted under 20        Section 35 of the Illinois Plumbing License Law; and21            (F) the rules adopted in accordance with Section 9 22        of the Fire Investigation Act.23    (3) Once a building permit is issued, the applicable 24requirements that are in effect on January 1 of the calendar 25year when the building permit was applied for, or, where a 26building permit is not required, on January 1 of the calendar   HB1809- 3 -LRB104 10472 HLH 20547 b1year when construction begins, shall be the only requirements 2that apply for the duration of the building permit or 3construction. 4    (b) (Blank).5    (c) Before January 1, 2027, the The qualification 6requirements of this Section do not apply to building 7enforcement personnel employed by a municipality or county who 8are acting in their official capacity. On and after January 1, 92027, the qualification requirements of this Section shall 10apply to building enforcement personnel employed by a 11municipality or county who are acting in their official 12capacity. This subsection is a limitation under subsection (i) 13of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 14concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 15exercised by the State. 16    (d) For purposes of this Section:17    "Commercial building" means any building other than: (i) a 18single-family home or a dwelling containing 2 or fewer 19apartments, condominiums, or townhouses; or (ii) a farm 20building as exempted from Section 3 of the Illinois 21Architecture Practice Act of 1989.22    "Newly constructed commercial building" means any 23commercial building for which original construction has 24commenced on or after July 1, 2011.25    "Non-building code jurisdiction" means any area of the 26State in a municipality or county having jurisdiction that:   HB1809- 4 -LRB104 10472 HLH 20547 b1(i) has not adopted a building code; or (ii) is required to but 2has not identified its adopted building code to the Board 3under Section 10.18 of the Capital Development Board Act.4    "Qualified inspector" means an individual certified as a 5commercial building inspector by the International Code 6Council or an equivalent nationally recognized building 7inspector certification organization, qualified as a 8construction and building inspector by successful completion 9of an apprentice program certified by the United States 10Department of Labor, or who has filed verification of 11inspection experience according to rules adopted by the Board 12for the purposes of conducting inspections in non-building 13code jurisdictions.14    "Substantial damage" means damage of any origin sustained 15by a structure whereby the cost of restoring the structure to 16its before-damaged condition would equal or exceed 50% of the 17market value of the structure before damage occurred. 18    "Substantially improved commercial building" means, for 19work commenced on or after January 1, 2025, any commercial 20building that has undergone any repair, reconstruction, 21rehabilitation, alteration, addition, or other improvement, 22the cost of which equals or exceeds 50% of the market value of 23the structure before the improvement or repair is started. If 24a commercial building has sustained substantial damage, any 25repairs are considered substantial improvement regardless of 26the actual repair work performed. "Substantially improved   HB1809- 5 -LRB104 10472 HLH 20547 b1commercial building" does not include: (i) any project for 2improvement of a structure to correct existing violations of 3State or local health, sanitary, or safety code specifications 4which have been identified by the local code enforcement 5official and which are the minimum necessary to assure safe 6living conditions or (ii) any alteration of a historic 7structure, provided that the alteration will not preclude the 8structure's continued designation as a historic structure. 9    (e) Except as provided in Section 15 of the Illinois 10Residential Building Code Act, new residential construction is 11exempt from this Section and is defined as any original 12construction of a single-family home or a dwelling containing 132 or fewer apartments, condominiums, or townhouses.14    (f) Local governments may establish agreements with other 15governmental entities within the State to issue permits and 16enforce building codes and may hire third-party providers that 17are qualified in accordance with this Section to provide 18inspection services.19    (g) This Section does not limit the applicability of any 20other statutorily authorized code or regulation administered 21by State agencies. These include, without limitation, the 22codes and regulations listed in subparagraphs (C) through (F) 23of paragraph (2) of subsection (a).24    (h) The changes to this Section made by Public Act 103-510 25this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly shall apply 26beginning on January 1, 2025.  HB1809- 6 -LRB104 10472 HLH 20547 b1(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-510, eff. 1-1-24; 2revised 7-24-24.) 3    (20 ILCS 3105/10.18)4    Sec. 10.18. Identification of local building codes. 5    (a) Any municipality or county adopting a new building 6code edition must, at least 30 days before the effective date 7of the building code, identify the model code being adopted, 8by title and edition, and any local amendments to the Board in 9writing. 10    (b) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly, any municipality 12or county that has adopted and is enforcing a building code 13must identify the adopted model code, by title and edition, 14and any local amendments, to the Board in writing. 15    (c) For each municipality and county subject to this 16Section, the Board must identify the adopted model code or 17codes, by title and edition, note if any local amendments were 18adopted, and identify the date when this information was 19reported to the Board on the Board's public website.20    (d) For the purposes of this Section, "building code" 21means a model code adopted with or without local amendments to 22regulate the construction or rehabilitation of structures 23within the municipality or county. "Building code" does not 24include any zoning ordinance adopted under Division 13 of 25Article 11 of the Illinois Municipal Code or Division 5-12 of   HB1809- 7 -LRB104 10472 HLH 20547 b1Article 5 of the Counties Code.2    (e) Beginning January 1, 2025, any municipal building code 3or county building code must:4        (1) regulate the structural design of new buildings, 5    other than residential buildings, in a manner that is at 6    least as stringent as the baseline building code;7        (2) regulate the structural design of rehabilitation 8    work in existing buildings, other than residential 9    buildings, in a manner that is at least as stringent as the 10    baseline existing building code; and11        (3) regulate the structural design of residential 12    buildings in a manner that is at least as stringent as the 13    baseline residential code.14    On and after January 1, 2027, any municipal building code 15or county building code must ensure that all code inspectors 16meet at least the minimum certification requirements required 17by the Board for non-building code jurisdictions. 18    In this subsection:19    "Baseline building code" means the edition of the 20International Building Code, including Appendix G, first 21published by the International Code Council during the current 22year or preceding 9 calendar years with the least restrictive 23provisions for structural design.24    "Baseline existing building code" means the edition of the 25International Existing Building Code first published by the 26International Code Council during the current year or   HB1809- 8 -LRB104 10472 HLH 20547 b1preceding 9 calendar years with the least restrictive 2provisions for structural design.3    "Baseline residential code" means the edition of the 4International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family 5Dwellings first published by the International Code Council 6during the current year or preceding 9 calendar years with the 7least restrictive provisions for structural design.8    "Residential building" means a single-family home or a 9dwelling containing 2 or fewer apartments, condominiums, or 10townhouses.11    "Structural design" means the capacity of a newly 12constructed structure or altered or repaired existing 13structure, including its foundation, to withstand forces, 14including, but not limited to, dead loads, live loads, snow 15loads, wind loads, soil loads and hydrostatic pressure, rain 16loads, and earthquake loads, and to resist flood damage.17    This subsection is a limitation under subsection (i) of 18Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 19concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 20exercised by the State.21    (f) On an annual basis, the Board shall send written 22notification to the corporate authorities of each municipality 23and county subject to this Section of their obligations under 24this Section. 25(Source: P.A. 103-510, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB1809- 9 -LRB104 10472 HLH 20547 b1    (20 ILCS 3105/10.20 new)2    Sec. 10.20. Minimum qualifications; code inspectors. 3    (a) The Board shall establish uniform statewide minimum 4qualification requirements for code inspectors and shall 5maintain a statewide registry and certification program for 6qualified inspectors to demonstrate their compliance with the 7minimum qualification requirements.8    (b) The qualification requirements shall, at a minimum, 9require an inspector to (i) be certified as a commercial 10building inspector by the International Code Council or an 11equivalent nationally recognized building inspector 12certification organization, (ii) be qualified as a 13construction and building inspector by successful completion 14of an apprentice program certified by the United States 15Department of Labor, or (iii) file a verification of 16inspection experience according to rules adopted by the Board 17for the purposes of conducting inspections.18    (c) The Board shall adopt rules to implement this Section 19no later than January 1, 2027. 20    Section 10. The Public Community College Act is amended by 21adding Section 2-13 as follows: 22    (110 ILCS 805/2-13 new)23    Sec. 2-13. Code inspectors. 24    (a) The State Board shall create a specific listing in its   HB1809- 10 -LRB104 10472 HLH 20547 b1directory of programs for courses and programs that prepare 2students to become code inspectors.3    (b) The State Board shall conduct a survey of all 4community colleges in the State to determine the current and 5historical enrollment in currently existing building 6code-related courses, the potential enrollment in those 7courses in community college districts that do not have those 8programs, the cost of the program to each community college 9that conducts such a program, and the anticipated cost of 10starting such a program for community colleges that do not 11have such a program. This survey must be completed no later 12than January 1, 2027.13    (c) The State Board shall use the data collected in 14subsection (b) to identify areas where new or expanded course 15offerings for building code inspection and enforcement would 16be most advantageous, prioritizing areas of the State where is 17there is no such course offered by a community college within 18100 miles. The State Board shall work with community college 19districts in those areas to create course offerings that 20prepare students to become code inspectors.